Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1114.05
County officers; salaries; Class 4 counties.

In counties of Class 4, the county clerk, register of deeds, assessor, treasurer, sheriff, attorney, appointive full-time veterans service officer, and the clerk of the district court shall each receive a minimum annual salary of seventy-five hundred dollars, to be paid periodically as other county employees out of the general fund.

Laws 1961, c. 96, § 5, p. 325;

Laws 1967, c. 128, § 5, p. 411;

Laws 1967, c. 127, § 4, p. 408;

Laws 1969, c. 164, § 4, p. 740;

Laws 1971, LB 574, § 5;

Laws 1972, LB 1157, § 4;

Laws 1973, LB 220, § 5;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 9.